Hawaii statutes.
[§305J-12]
Requirements to maintain authorization. (a) Authorization by the director
shall be conditioned on the maintenance of accreditation by the institution and
compliance with section 305J-14. Authorization shall be automatically
suspended effective as of the date of the cancellation or expiration of
accreditation or the cancellation or expiration of the surety bond if a surety
bond was filed with the department. The director shall not reinstate the
affected institution until satisfactory proof of compliance is submitted to the
department. Failure to reinstate a suspended authorization within sixty days
of suspension shall result in the termination of the authorization, and the
institution shall forfeit all fees and shall be required to apply for
authorization as a new applicant.

(b) An institution's authorization shall be
placed on probationary status without further action by the department in the
event that:

(1) The institution is placed on probationary status
by its accrediting agency, contemporaneous with the action of such agency;

(2) The institution's accrediting agency ceases to be
recognized by the United States Department of Education; or

(3) In the case of a seminary or religious training
institution, the seminary or religious training institution no longer meets the
definition of such under this chapter.

(c) An institution may, within fifteen days of
the receipt of the notification of probation under this section, request an
administrative hearing for review pursuant to chapter 91.

(d) If an institution's authorization is
revoked due to the institution's loss of accreditation, the institution shall
provide written notice to all students within thirty days following the date of
revocation.

(e) A private college or university, seminary,
or religious training institution that is authorized pursuant to this chapter
shall:

(1) Not make or cause to be made any oral, written,
or visual statement or representation that violates section 305J-11(b);

(2) Provide the department with a copy of its
enrollment agreement, if applicable, in accordance with its reauthorization
schedule;

(3) Provide bona fide instruction, in accordance with
the standards and criteria set by its accrediting body; and

(4) If its ownership changes, provide the department
with any material information concerning the transaction at least thirty days
prior to the transaction. [L 2013, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next